Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Collection of Items:
Payor Banks.

Sec. 45.04.301.
Deferred posting; recovery of payment by return of items; time of dishonor; return of items by payor bank.

If a payor bank settles for a demand item other than a documentary draft presented other than for immediate payment over the counter before midnight of the banking day of receipt, the payor bank may revoke the settlement and recover the settlement if, before it has made final payment and before its midnight deadline, it

returns the item; or

sends written notice of dishonor or nonpayment if the item is unavailable for return.

If a demand item is received by a payor bank for credit on its books, it may return the item or send notice of dishonor and may revoke a credit given or recover the amount of the credit withdrawn by its customer if it acts within the time limit and in the manner specified in (a) of this section.

Unless previous notice of dishonor has been sent, an item is dishonored at the time when, for purposes of dishonor, it is returned or notice is sent in accordance with this section.

An item is returned

as to an item presented through a clearinghouse, when it is delivered to the presenting or last collecting bank or to the clearinghouse or is sent or delivered in accordance with clearinghouse rules; or

in all other cases, when it is sent or delivered to the bank’s customer or transferor or under the instructions of the customer or transferor.

History.

(§ 4.301 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 109 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

Construction and effect of UCC §§ 4-301 and 4-302 making payor bank accountable for failure to act promptly on item presented for payment, 22 ALR4th 10.

Sec. 45.04.302.
Payor bank’s responsibility for late return of item.

If an item is presented to and received by a payor bank, the bank is accountable for the amount of

a demand item, other than a documentary draft, whether properly payable or not, if the bank,

in any case in which it is not also the depositary bank, retains the item beyond midnight of the banking day of receipt without settling for it; or

whether or not it is also the depositary bank, does not pay or return the item or send notice of dishonor until after its midnight deadline; or

any other properly payable item unless, within the time allowed for acceptance or payment of that item, the bank either accepts or pays the item or returns it and accompanying documents.

The liability of a payor bank to pay an item under (a) of this section is subject to defenses based on breach of a presentment warranty under AS

45.04.208

or proof that the person seeking enforcement of the liability presented or transferred the item for the purpose of defrauding the payor bank.

History.

(§ 4.302 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 110, 111 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

Construction and effect of UCC §§ 4-301 and 4-302 making payor bank accountable of failure to act promptly on item presented for payment, 22 ALR4th 10.

Liability of bank for diversion to benefit of presenter or third party of proceeds of check drawn to bank’s order by drawer not indebted to bank, 69 ALR4th 778.

Sec. 45.04.303.
When items subject to notice, stop-payment order, legal process, or setoff; order in which items may be charged or certified.

Any knowledge, notice, or stop-payment order received by, legal process served upon, or setoff exercised by a payor bank is too late to terminate, suspend, or modify the bank’s right or duty to pay an item or to charge its customer’s account for the item if the knowledge, notice, stop-payment order, or legal process is received or served and a reasonable time for the bank to act on it expires or the setoff is exercised after the earliest of the following:

the bank accepts or certifies the item;

the bank pays the item in cash;

the bank settles for the item without having a right to revoke the settlement under statute, clearinghouse rule, or agreement;

the bank becomes accountable for the amount of the item under AS

45.04.302

, which deals with the payor bank’s responsibility for late return of items; or

with respect to checks, a cutoff hour no earlier than one hour after the opening of the next banking day after the banking day on which the bank received the check and no later than the close of that next banking day or, if a cutoff hour is not fixed, the close of the next banking day after the banking day on which the bank received the check.

Subject to (a) of this section, items may be accepted, paid, certified, or charged to the indicated account of its customer in any order.

History.

(§ 4.303 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 112 ch 35 SLA 1993)